Utah statutes.
49-11-406.   Governor's appointed executives and senior staff -- Appointed
legislative employees -- Transfer of value of accrued defined benefit --
Procedures.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Defined benefit balance" means the total amount of the contributions
made on behalf of a member to a defined benefit system plus refund interest.
(b)  "Senior staff" means an at-will employee who reports directly to an
elected official, executive director, or director and includes a deputy
director and other similar, at-will employee positions designated by the
governor, the speaker of the House, or the president of the Senate and filed
with the Department of Human Resource Management and the Utah State Retirement
Office.
(2)  In accordance with this section and subject to federal law, a member who
has service credit from a system may elect to be exempt from coverage under a
defined benefit system and to have the member's defined benefit balance
transferred from the defined benefit system or plan to a defined contribution
plan in the member's own name if the member is:
(a)  the state auditor;
(b)  the state treasurer;
(c)  an appointed executive under Subsection 67-22-2(1)(a);
(d)  an employee in the Governor's Office;
(e)  senior staff in the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget;
(f)  senior staff in the Governor's Office of Economic Development;
(g)  senior staff in the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice;
(h)  a legislative employee appointed under Subsection 36-12-7(3)(a); or
(i)  a legislative employee appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, the House of Representatives minority leader, the president
of the Senate, or the Senate minority leader.
(3)  An election made under Subsection (2):
(a)  is final, and no right exists to make any further election;
(b)  is considered a request to be exempt from coverage under a defined
benefits system; and
(c)  shall be made on forms provided by the office.
(4)  The board shall adopt rules to implement and administer this section.
